Oklahoma, session 2025, SB72.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 5011, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5011. A. Except as otherwise provided by this section,


beginning with the calendar year 1990 and for each calendar year


through 1998, and for calendar year 2003, any individual who is a


resident of and is domiciled in this state during the entire


calendar year for which the filing is made and whose gross household


income for such year does not exceed Twelve Thousand Dollars


($12,000.00) may file a claim for sales tax relief.


B. For calendar years 1999, 2002, and 2004, any individual who


is a resident of and is domiciled in this state during the entire


calendar year for which the filing is made may file a claim for

Req. No. 941 Page 1


sales tax relief if the gross household income for such year does


not exceed the following amounts:


1. For an individual not subject to the provisions of paragraph


of this subsection and claiming no allowable personal exemption


other than the allowable personal exemption for that individual or


the spouse of that individual, Fifteen Thousand Dollars


($15,000.00); or


2. For an individual claiming one or more allowable personal


exemptions other than the allowable personal exemption for that


individual or the spouse of that individual, an individual with a


physical disability constituting a substantial handicap disability


to employment, or an individual who is sixty-five (65) years of age


or older at the close of the tax year, Thirty Thousand Dollars


($30,000.00).


C. For calendar years 2000, 2001, 2005 and following and 2005


through 2024, an individual who is a resident of and is domiciled in


this state during the entire calendar year for which the filing is


made may file a claim for sales tax relief if the gross household


income for such year does not exceed the following amounts:


1. For an individual not subject to the provisions of paragraph


of this subsection and claiming no allowable personal exemption


other than the allowable personal exemption for that individual or


the spouse of that individual, Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00);


or

Req. No. 941 Page 2


2. For an individual claiming one or more allowable personal


exemptions other than the allowable personal exemption for that


individual or the spouse of that individual, an individual with a


physical disability constituting a substantial handicap disability


to employment, or an individual who is sixty-five (65) years of age


or older at the close of the tax year, Fifty Thousand Dollars


($50,000.00).


D. The amount of the claim filed pursuant to the Sales Tax


Relief Act shall be Forty Dollars ($40.00) multiplied by the number


of allowable personal exemptions for calendar year 2024 and previous


calendar years.


E. For calendar year 2025 and subsequent calendar years, an


individual who is a resident of and is domiciled in this state


during the entire calendar year for which the filing is made may


file a claim for sales tax relief in the following amounts,


multiplied by the number of allowable personal exemptions:


1. For an individual not subject to the provisions of paragraph


of this subsection and claiming no allowable personal exemption


other than the allowable personal exemption for that individual or


the spouse of that individual:


a. Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for an individual whose


household income for the year does not exceed Thirty-


five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00), or



Req. No. 941 Page 3


b. One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for an individual whose


household income for the year does not exceed Forty


Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00); and


2. For an individual claiming one or more allowable personal


exemptions other than the allowable personal exemption for that


individual or the spouse of that individual, an individual with a


physical disability constituting a substantial disability to


employment, or an individual who is sixty-five (65) years of age or


older at the close of the tax year:


a. Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for an individual whose


household income for the year does not exceed Forty-


five Thousand Dollars ($45,000.00), or


b. One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00) for an individual


whose household income for the year does not exceed


Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00).


F. As used in the Sales Tax Relief Act, “allowable personal


exemption” means a personal exemption to which the taxpayer would be


entitled pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act,


except for:


1. The exemptions such taxpayer would be entitled to pursuant


to Section 2358 of this title if such taxpayer or spouse is blind or


sixty-five (65) years of age or older at the close of the tax year;


2. An exemption for a person convicted of a felony if during


all or any part of the calendar year for which the claim is filed

Req. No. 941 Page 4


such person was an inmate in the custody of the Department of


Corrections; or


3. An exemption for a person if during all or any part of the


calendar year for which the claim is filed such person resided


outside of this state.


E. G. A person convicted of a felony shall not be permitted to


file a claim for sales tax relief pursuant to the provisions of


Sections 5010 through 5016 of this title for the period of time


during which the person is an inmate in the custody of the


Department of Corrections. Such period of time shall include the


entire calendar year if the person is in the custody of the


Department of Corrections during any part of the calendar year. The


provisions of this subsection shall not prohibit all other members


of the household of an inmate from filing a claim based upon the


personal exemptions to which the household members would be entitled


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


F. H. The Department of Corrections shall withhold up to fifty


percent (50%) of any money inmates receive for claims made pursuant


to the Sales Tax Relief Act prior to September 1, 1991, for costs of


incarceration.


G. I. For purposes of Section 139.105 of Title 17 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, the gross household income of any individual who


may file a claim for sales tax relief shall not exceed Twelve


Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00).

Req. No. 941 Page 5


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-941 QD 1/19/2025 5:41:58 AM











































Req. No. 941 Page 6